Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska23-1204.06
Deputies; grant program for termination of parental rights actions.

A grant program is established to reimburse counties for the personal service costs of deputy county attorneys associated with termination of parental rights actions resulting from Laws 1998, LB 1041. Counties in which a city of the metropolitan class or a city of the primary class is located are eligible for grants under this program. The Department of Health and Human Services shall administer the program. Counties receiving grants shall submit quarterly expenditure reports to the department.

Laws 1998, LB 1041, § 47;

Laws 2007, LB296, § 24.